Arkansas, session 2025, SB196.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REAPPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS STATE UNIVERSITY. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Arkansas State University, to be payable from the
Development and Enhancement Fund, for the Arkansas State University the
following:
(A) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (A) of Section 1 of Act 108 of 2024, for construction, renovation,
maintenance, equipment, personal services and operating expenses of the
various institutions and entities of the Arkansas State University System, in
a sum not to exceed .............................................$25,000,000.
(B) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (B) of Section 1 of Act 108 of 2024, for costs of construction of an
Art and Innovation District, in a sum not to exceed ..............$2,000,000.
(C) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (C) of Section 1 of Act 108 of 2024, for costs of construction of an
Athletic and Club Sport Campus, in a sum not to exceed ...........$2,000,000.
(D) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
*HAR045*
02/04/2025 10:24:38 AM HAR045

SB196
in Item (D) of Section 1 of Act 108 of 2024, for campus buildings deferred
maintenance, in a sum not to exceed ..............................$5,000,000.
(E) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (E) of Section 1 of Act 108 of 2024, for critical maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$720,000.
(F) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (F) of Section 1 of Act 108 of 2024, for deferred maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ................................................$2,920,000.
(G) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (G) of Section 1 of Act 108 of 2024, for the purchase, replacement,
and renewal of equipment and library holdings, in a sum not to exceed
..................................................................$2,945,929.

SECTION 2. REAPPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS STATE UNIVERSITY - LAKEPORT
PLANTATION HOUSE HUMIDITY AND TEMPERATURE CONTROL. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Arkansas State University, to be payable from the
Arkansas Natural and Cultural Resources Grant and Trust Fund, for the
Arkansas State University the following:
(A) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Section 25 of Act 24 of 2024, for the acquisition, management,
stewardship, or preservation of state owned lands, historic sites, buildings,
structures, or objects, in a sum not to exceed .....................$594,000.

SECTION 3. REAPPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS TECH UNIVERSITY. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Arkansas Tech University, to be payable from the
Development and Enhancement Fund, for the Arkansas Tech University the
following:
(A) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (A) of Section 4 of Act 108 of 2024, for renovation for Brown
Building academic utilization, in a sum not to exceed ............$1,475,548.
(B) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (B) of Section 4 of Act 108 of 2024, for utility upgrades, in a sum
not to exceed ....................................................$4,524,452.
(C) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (C) of Section 4 of Act 108 of 2024, for technology upgrades, in a
sum not to exceed ................................................$3,000,000.
02/04/2025 10:24:38 AM HAR045

SB196
(D) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (D) of Section 4 of Act 108 of 2024, for critical maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ................................................$1,230,000.
(E) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (E) of Section 4 of Act 108 of 2024, for deferred maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ................................................$3,860,000.
(F) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (F) of Section 4 of Act 108 of 2024, for the purchase, replacement,
and renewal of equipment and library holdings, in a sum not to exceed
..................................................................$1,157,352.
(G) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (G) of Section 4 of Act 108 of 2024, for reroofing the Allied Health
Building on the Ozark Campus, in a sum not to exceed ...............$177,765.
(H) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (H) of Section 4 of Act 108 of 2024, for costs of construction of the
ATCC Tech Center, in a sum not to exceed .........................$1,000,000.
(I) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (I) of Section 4 of Act 108 of 2024, for costs of construction of the
Ozark Technology and Trade Center, in a sum not to exceed ..........$822,235.
(J) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (J) of Section 4 of Act 108 of 2024, for critical maintenance for the
Ozark Campus, in a sum not to exceed ................................$20,000.
(K) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (K) of Section 4 of Act 108 of 2024, for deferred maintenance for the
Ozark Campus, in a sum not to exceed ...............................$210,000.

SECTION 4. REAPPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS TECH UNIVERSITY - TECHIONERY
RENOVATION. There is hereby appropriated, to the Arkansas Tech University,
to be payable from the Arkansas Natural and Cultural Resources Grant and
Trust Fund, for the Arkansas Tech University the following:
(A) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Section 25 of Act 24 of 2024, for the acquisition, management,
stewardship, or preservation of state owned lands, historic sites, buildings,
structures, or objects, in a sum not to exceed .....................$810,445.

SECTION 5. REAPPROPRIATION - HENDERSON STATE UNIVERSITY. There is
02/04/2025 10:24:38 AM HAR045

SB196
hereby appropriated, to the Henderson State University, to be payable from
the Development and Enhancement Fund, for the Henderson State University the
following:
(A) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (A) of Section 5 of Act 108 of 2024, for construction, renovation,
maintenance, and equipment, in a sum not to exceed ...............$8,000,000.
(B) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (B) of Section 5 of Act 108 of 2024, for critical maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$280,000.
(C) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (C) of Section 5 of Act 108 of 2024, for deferred maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ................................................$1,940,000.
(D) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (D) of Section 5 of Act 108 of 2024, for the purchase, replacement,
and renewal of equipment and library holdings, in a sum not to exceed
....................................................................$516,704.

SECTION 6. REAPPROPRIATION - HENDERSON STATE UNIVERSITY - RUSSELL FINE
ARTS BUILDING. There is hereby appropriated, to the Henderson State
University, to be payable from the Arkansas Natural and Cultural Resources
Grant and Trust Fund, for the Henderson State University the following:
(A) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Section 25 of Act 24 of 2024, for the acquisition, management,
stewardship, or preservation of state owned lands, historic sites, buildings,
structures, or objects, in a sum not to exceed .....................$800,000.

SECTION 7. REAPPROPRIATION - HENDERSON STATE UNIVERSITY - MOONEY HALL.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Henderson State University, to be
payable from the Arkansas Natural and Cultural Resources Grant and Trust
Fund, for the Henderson State University the following:
(A) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Section 25 of Act 24 of 2024, for the acquisition, management,
stewardship, or preservation of state owned lands, historic sites, buildings,
structures, or objects, in a sum not to exceed .....................$700,000.

SECTION 8. REAPPROPRIATION - HENDERSON STATE UNIVERSITY - SMITH HALL.
02/04/2025 10:24:38 AM HAR045

SB196
There is hereby appropriated, to the Henderson State University, to be
payable from the Arkansas Natural and Cultural Resources Grant and Trust
Fund, for the Henderson State University the following:
(A) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Section 25 of Act 24 of 2024, for the acquisition, management,
stewardship, or preservation of state owned lands, historic sites, buildings,
structures, or objects, in a sum not to exceed .....................$400,000.

SECTION 9. REAPPROPRIATION - SOUTHERN ARKANSAS UNIVERSITY. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Southern Arkansas University, to be payable from
the Development and Enhancement Fund, for the Southern Arkansas University
the following:
(A) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (A) of Section 8 of Act 108 of 2024, for costs of HVAC upgrades, in a
sum not to exceed ................................................$4,000,000.
(B) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (B) of Section 8 of Act 108 of 2024, for technology upgrades, in a
sum not to exceed ................................................$4,000,000.
(C) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (C) of Section 8 of Act 108 of 2024, for critical maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$530,000.
(D) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (D) of Section 8 of Act 108 of 2024, for deferred maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ................................................$1,950,000.
(E) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (E) of Section 8 of Act 108 of 2024, for the purchase, replacement,
and renewal of equipment and library holdings, in a sum not to exceed
....................................................................$732,352.

SECTION 10. REAPPROPRIATION - SOUTHERN ARKANSAS UNIVERSITY - GREENE
HALL RENOVATIONS. There is hereby appropriated, to the Southern Arkansas
University, to be payable from the Arkansas Natural and Cultural Resources
Grant and Trust Fund, for the Southern Arkansas University the following:
(A) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Section 25 of Act 24 of 2024, for the acquisition, management,
stewardship, or preservation of state owned lands, historic sites, buildings,
02/04/2025 10:24:38 AM HAR045

SB196
structures, or objects, in a sum not to exceed ...................$1,454,342.

SECTION 11. REAPPROPRIATION - UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS FOR MEDICAL
SCIENCES. There is hereby appropriated, to the University of Arkansas for
Medical Sciences, to be payable from the Development and Enhancement Fund,
for the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences the following:
(A) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (A) of Section 11 of Act 108 of 2024, for renovation of the Barton
Building, in a sum not to exceed .................................$2,000,000.
(B) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (B) of Section 11 of Act 108 of 2024, for renovation of the Monroe
Building, in a sum not to exceed .................................$2,000,000.
(C) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (C) of Section 11 of Act 108 of 2024, for renovation of the EDII 6th
Floor for the College of Pharmacy, in a sum not to exceed ........$2,000,000.
(D) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (D) of Section 11 of Act 108 of 2024, for renovation of the Central
Building - Floors 2-8, in a sum not to exceed ....................$2,000,000.
(E) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (E) of Section 11 of Act 108 of 2024, for Central Building Clinical
Lab AHU replacement, in a sum not to exceed ........................$600,000.
(F) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (F) of Section 11 of Act 108 of 2024, for Central Building Penthouse
electrical infrastructure, in a sum not to exceed ..................$450,000.
(G) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (G) of Section 11 of Act 108 of 2024, for UAMS West Central Energy
Plant Addition and Interconnect, in a sum not to exceed ............$950,000.
(H) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (H) of Section 11 of Act 108 of 2024, for critical maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ................................................$7,220,000.
(I) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (I) of Section 11 of Act 108 of 2024, for deferred maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ...............................................$11,630,000.
(J) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (J) of Section 11 of Act 108 of 2024, for the purchase, replacement,
and renewal of equipment and library holdings, in a sum not to exceed
02/04/2025 10:24:38 AM HAR045

SB196
..................................................................$1,802,814.

SECTION 12. REAPPROPRIATION - UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the University of Arkansas, to be payable from the
Development and Enhancement Fund, for the University of Arkansas the
following:
(A) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (A) of Section 12 of Act 108 of 2024, for restoration of the
Agriculture Building, in a sum not to exceed .....................$2,000,000.
(B) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (B) of Section 12 of Act 108 of 2024, for restoration of the Leflar
Law Center North Wing, in a sum not to exceed ....................$2,000,000.
(C) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (C) of Section 12 of Act 108 of 2024, for restoration of Memorial
Hall, in a sum not to exceed .....................................$2,000,000.
(D) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (D) of Section 12 of Act 108 of 2024, for restoration and renovation
of the Fine Arts Center and University Theatre, in a sum not to exceed
..................................................................$2,000,000.
(E) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (E) of Section 12 of Act 108 of 2024, for restoration and renovation
of the John A. White, Jr. Engineering Hall, in a sum not to exceed
..................................................................$2,000,000.
(F) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (F) of Section 12 of Act 108 of 2024, for critical maintenance for
the U of A - Fayetteville, in a sum not to exceed ................$5,730,000.
(G) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (G) of Section 12 of Act 108 of 2024, for deferred maintenance for
the U of A - Fayetteville, in a sum not to exceed ................$9,910,000.
(H) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (H) of Section 12 of Act 108 of 2024, for the purchase, replacement,
and renewal of equipment and library holdings for the U of A - Fayetteville,
in a sum not to exceed ...........................................$4,814,389.
(I) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (I) of Section 12 of Act 108 of 2024, for costs of construction for
System Office expansion, in a sum not to exceed ..................$1,974,150.
02/04/2025 10:24:38 AM HAR045

SB196
(J) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (J) of Section 12 of Act 108 of 2024, for construction, renovation,
maintenance, equipment, personal services and operating expenses of the
various institutions and entities of the University of Arkansas System, in a
sum not to exceed ...............................................$23,000,000.
(K) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (K) of Section 12 of Act 108 of 2024, for critical maintenance for
the U of A - System, in a sum not to exceed .........................$10,000.
(L) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (L) of Section 12 of Act 108 of 2024, for deferred maintenance for
the U of A - System, in a sum not to exceed .........................$50,000.
(M) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (M) of Section 12 of Act 108 of 2024, for costs of constructing the
Department of Food Science Building replacement, in a sum not to exceed
..................................................................$3,500,000.
(N) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (N) of Section 12 of Act 108 of 2024, for costs of construction of
the Lonoke Extension Center expansion, in a sum not to exceed ....$1,500,000.
(O) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (O) of Section 12 of Act 108 of 2024, for critical maintenance for
the U of A - Division of Agriculture, in a sum not to exceed ........$70,000.
(P) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (P) of Section 12 of Act 108 of 2024, for deferred maintenance for
the U of A - Division of Agriculture, in a sum not to exceed .....$1,680,000.
(Q) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (Q) of Section 12 of Act 108 of 2024, for remote sensing and
archeological object analysis, in a sum not to exceed ..............$252,500.
(R) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (R) of Section 12 of Act 108 of 2024, for archeological data/object
security and accessibility, in a sum not to exceed .................$123,750.
(S) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (S) of Section 12 of Act 108 of 2024, for deferred maintenance of the
U of A - Arkansas Archeological Survey, in a sum not to exceed ......$80,000.
(T) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (T) of Section 12 of Act 108 of 2024, for replacement of AREON core
network equipment, in a sum not to exceed ..........................$150,000.
02/04/2025 10:24:38 AM HAR045

SB196
(U) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (U) of Section 12 of Act 108 of 2024, for renovation of the Arkansas
School for Mathematics, Sciences, and the Arts (ASMSA) maintenance shop, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$900,000.
(V) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (V) of Section 12 of Act 108 of 2024, for ASMSA campus ADA
accessibility improvements, in a sum not to exceed .................$250,000.
(W) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (W) of Section 12 of Act 108 of 2024, for STEM Research Lab upgrades,
in a sum not to exceed .............................................$350,000.
(X) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (X) of Section 12 of Act 108 of 2024, for personal services and
general operating expenses of the Partners for Inclusive Communities - Sickle
Cell Anemia Task Force, in a sum not to exceed ......................$60,000.
(Y) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (Y) of Section 12 of Act 108 of 2024, for construction, renovation,
maintenance, equipment, personal services and operating expenses of the
various institutions and entities of the University of Arkansas System, in a
sum not to exceed ......................................................$834.

SECTION 13. REAPPROPRIATION - UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS - BAYOU
BARTHOLOMEW ARCHEOLOGY COLLECTION REHABILITATION. There is hereby
appropriated, to the University of Arkansas, to be payable from the Arkansas
Natural and Cultural Resources Grant and Trust Fund, for the University of
Arkansas the following:
(A) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Section 25 of Act 24 of 2024, for the acquisition, management,
stewardship, or preservation of state owned lands, historic sites, buildings,
structures, or objects, in a sum not to exceed ......................$88,231.

SECTION 14. REAPPROPRIATION - UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS - MANAGING STATE
ARCHEOLOGICAL SITES USING LIDAR IMAGING. There is hereby appropriated, to
the University of Arkansas, to be payable from the Arkansas Natural and
Cultural Resources Grant and Trust Fund, for the University of Arkansas the
following:
(A) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
02/04/2025 10:24:38 AM HAR045

SB196
in Section 25 of Act 24 of 2024, for the acquisition, management,
stewardship, or preservation of state owned lands, historic sites, buildings,
structures, or objects, in a sum not to exceed ......................$90,189.

SECTION 15. REAPPROPRIATION - UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS - VAN WINKLE'S
MILL. There is hereby appropriated, to the University of Arkansas, to be
payable from the Arkansas Natural and Cultural Resources Grant and Trust
Fund, for the University of Arkansas the following:
(A) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Section 25 of Act 24 of 2024, for the acquisition, management,
stewardship, or preservation of state owned lands, historic sites, buildings,
structures, or objects, in a sum not to exceed ......................$64,350.

SECTION 16. REAPPROPRIATION - UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS - DESIGN
DEVELOPMENT FOR IMPROVED HVAC SYSTEM. There is hereby appropriated, to the
University of Arkansas, to be payable from the Arkansas Natural and Cultural
Resources Grant and Trust Fund, for the University of Arkansas the following:
(A) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Section 25 of Act 24 of 2024, for the acquisition, management,
stewardship, or preservation of state owned lands, historic sites, buildings,
structures, or objects, in a sum not to exceed ......................$67,395.

SECTION 17. REAPPROPRIATION - UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS - EXPANDING THE
LEGACY OF THE CCC AT DEVIL'S DEN AND PETIT JEAN STATE PARKS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the University of Arkansas, to be payable from the Arkansas
Natural and Cultural Resources Grant and Trust Fund, for the University of
Arkansas the following:
(A) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Section 25 of Act 24 of 2024, for the acquisition, management,
stewardship, or preservation of state owned lands, historic sites, buildings,
structures, or objects, in a sum not to exceed .....................$282,360.

SECTION 18. REAPPROPRIATION - UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS - GARVAN WOODLAND
GARDENS CONSTRUCTION AND RENEWAL. There is hereby appropriated, to the
University of Arkansas, to be payable from the Arkansas Natural and Cultural
Resources Grant and Trust Fund, for the University of Arkansas the following:
02/04/2025 10:24:38 AM HAR045

SB196
(A) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Section 25 of Act 24 of 2024, for the acquisition, management,
stewardship, or preservation of state owned lands, historic sites, buildings,
structures, or objects, in a sum not to exceed ...................$1,295,000.

SECTION 19. REAPPROPRIATION - UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS AT FORT SMITH.
There is hereby appropriated, to the University of Arkansas at Fort Smith, to
be payable from the Development and Enhancement Fund, for the University of
Arkansas at Fort Smith the following:
(A) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (A) of Section 18 of Act 108 of 2024, for costs of construction and
renovation for the UAFS Center for Workforce Development, in a sum not to
exceed ...........................................................$6,522,500.
(B) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (B) of Section 18 of Act 108 of 2024, for critical maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$570,000.
(C) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (C) of Section 18 of Act 108 of 2024, for deferred maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ................................................$1,670,000.
(D) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (D) of Section 18 of Act 108 of 2024, for the purchase, replacement,
and renewal of equipment and library holdings, in a sum not to exceed
....................................................................$622,683.

SECTION 20. REAPPROPRIATION - UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS AT LITTLE ROCK.
There is hereby appropriated, to the University of Arkansas at Little Rock,
to be payable from the Development and Enhancement Fund, for the University
of Arkansas at Little Rock the following:
(A) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (A) of Section 19 of Act 108 of 2024, for improvements to technology
infrastructure, in a sum not to exceed ...........................$3,500,000.
(B) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (B) of Section 19 of Act 108 of 2024, for building infrastructure and
critical maintenance, in a sum not to exceed .....................$3,000,000.
(C) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (C) of Section 19 of Act 108 of 2024, for classroom technology
02/04/2025 10:24:38 AM HAR045

SB196
improvements, in a sum not to exceed .............................$3,000,000.
(D) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (D) of Section 19 of Act 108 of 2024, for critical maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ................................................$6,590,000.
(E) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (E) of Section 19 of Act 108 of 2024, for deferred maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ................................................$5,680,000.
(F) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (F) of Section 19 of Act 108 of 2024, for the purchase, replacement,
and renewal of equipment and library holdings, in a sum not to exceed
..................................................................$1,542,601.

SECTION 21. REAPPROPRIATION - UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS AT LITTLE ROCK -
SUSTAINABLE BUILDING DESIGN. There is hereby appropriated, to the University
of Arkansas at Little Rock, to be payable from the Sustainable Building
Design Revolving Loan Fund, for the University of Arkansas at Little Rock the
following:
(A) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (A) of Section 20 of Act 108 of 2024, for construction, renovation,
maintenance and operating expenses, in a sum not to exceed ..........$71,616.

SECTION 22. REAPPROPRIATION - UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS AT MONTICELLO.
There is hereby appropriated, to the University of Arkansas at Monticello, to
be payable from the Development and Enhancement Fund, for the University of
Arkansas at Monticello the following:
(A) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (A) of Section 21 of Act 108 of 2024, for renovation of the Math and
Science Center, in a sum not to exceed ...........................$3,250,000.
(B) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (B) of Section 21 of Act 108 of 2024, for HVAC upgrades for MCB and
Science Center, in a sum not to exceed ...........................$2,500,000.
(C) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (C) of Section 21 of Act 108 of 2024, for renovation of the Fine Arts
Center, in a sum not to exceed ...................................$1,000,000.
(D) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (D) of Section 21 of Act 108 of 2024, for renovation of the Music
02/04/2025 10:24:38 AM HAR045

SB196
Building, in a sum not to exceed ...................................$750,000.
(E) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (E) of Section 21 of Act 108 of 2024, for deferred maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ................................................$2,430,000.
(F) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (F) of Section 21 of Act 108 of 2024, for the purchase, replacement,
and renewal of equipment and library holdings, in a sum not to exceed
....................................................................$408,269.
(G) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (G) of Section 21 of Act 108 of 2024, for costs of construction of
the Workforce/Collegiate Center on the Crossett campus, in a sum not to
exceed ...........................................................$2,000,000.
(H) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (H) of Section 21 of Act 108 of 2024, for deferred maintenance for
the Crossett campus, in a sum not to exceed ........................$120,000.
(I) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (I) of Section 21 of Act 108 of 2024, for costs of construction of a
General Education Building on the McGehee campus, in a sum not to exceed
..................................................................$2,000,000.
(J) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (J) of Section 21 of Act 108 of 2024, for deferred maintenance for
the McGehee campus, in a sum not to exceed .........................$150,000.

SECTION 23. REAPPROPRIATION - UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS AT MONTICELLO -
1937 FACULTY HOUSE WALLPAPER. There is hereby appropriated, to the
University of Arkansas at Monticello, to be payable from the Arkansas Natural
and Cultural Resources Grant and Trust Fund, for the University of Arkansas
at Monticello the following:
(A) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Section 25 of Act 24 of 2024, for the acquisition, management,
stewardship, or preservation of state owned lands, historic sites, buildings,
structures, or objects, in a sum not to exceed ......................$34,142.

SECTION 24. REAPPROPRIATION - UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS AT MONTICELLO -
1954 STUDENT UNION BUILDING. There is hereby appropriated, to the University
of Arkansas at Monticello, to be payable from the Arkansas Natural and
02/04/2025 10:24:38 AM HAR045

SB196
Cultural Resources Grant and Trust Fund, for the University of Arkansas at
Monticello the following:
(A) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Section 25 of Act 24 of 2024, for the acquisition, management,
stewardship, or preservation of state owned lands, historic sites, buildings,
structures, or objects, in a sum not to exceed .....................$855,012.

SECTION 25. REAPPROPRIATION - UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS AT MONTICELLO -
TROTTER HOUSE FAUX PAINTING. There is hereby appropriated, to the University
of Arkansas at Monticello, to be payable from the Arkansas Natural and
Cultural Resources Grant and Trust Fund, for the University of Arkansas at
Monticello the following:
(A) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Section 25 of Act 24 of 2024, for the acquisition, management,
stewardship, or preservation of state owned lands, historic sites, buildings,
structures, or objects, in a sum not to exceed ......................$45,115.

SECTION 26. REAPPROPRIATION - UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS AT PINE BLUFF.
There is hereby appropriated, to the University of Arkansas at Pine Bluff, to
be payable from the Development and Enhancement Fund, for the University of
Arkansas at Pine Bluff the following:
(A) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (A) of Section 24 of Act 108 of 2024, for renovation for fire
protection, in a sum not to exceed ...............................$2,000,000.
(B) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (B) of Section 24 of Act 108 of 2024, for renovation of dormitory, in
a sum not to exceed ..............................................$2,000,000.
(C) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (C) of Section 24 of Act 108 of 2024, for renovation of the police
station, in a sum not to exceed ..................................$1,000,000.
(D) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (D) of Section 24 of Act 108 of 2024, for campus security fencing, in
a sum not to exceed ................................................$500,000.
(E) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (E) of Section 24 of Act 108 of 2024, for renovation of restrooms, in
a sum not to exceed ................................................$500,000.
02/04/2025 10:24:38 AM HAR045

SB196
(F) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (F) of Section 24 of Act 108 of 2024, for domestic water upgrades, in
a sum not to exceed ................................................$500,000.
(G) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (G) of Section 24 of Act 108 of 2024, for elevator upgrades and
modernization, in a sum not to exceed ..............................$500,000.
(H) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (H) of Section 24 of Act 108 of 2024, for critical maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ..................................................$490,000.
(I) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (I) of Section 24 of Act 108 of 2024, for deferred maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ................................................$1,630,000.
(J) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (J) of Section 24 of Act 108 of 2024, for the purchase, replacement,
and renewal of equipment and library holdings, in a sum not to exceed
....................................................................$373,244.
(K) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (K) of Section 24 of Act 108 of 2024, for matching funds for the 1890
Research and Extension Programs, in a sum not to exceed ............$144,000.
(L) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (L) of Section 24 of Act 108 of 2024, for matching funds for the 1890
Research and Extension Programs, in a sum not to exceed ............$700,000.

SECTION 27. REAPPROPRIATION - UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS AT PINE BLUFF -
HAZZARD GYMNASIUM RENOVATION PHASE II. There is hereby appropriated, to the
University of Arkansas at Pine Bluff, to be payable from the Arkansas Natural
and Cultural Resources Grant and Trust Fund, for the University of Arkansas
at Pine Bluff the following:
(A) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Section 25 of Act 24 of 2024, for the acquisition, management,
stewardship, or preservation of state owned lands, historic sites, buildings,
structures, or objects, in a sum not to exceed ...................$2,000,000.

SECTION 28. REAPPROPRIATION - UNIVERSITY OF CENTRAL ARKANSAS. There is
hereby appropriated, to the University of Central Arkansas, to be payable
from the Development and Enhancement Fund, for the University of Central
02/04/2025 10:24:38 AM HAR045

SB196
Arkansas the following:
(A) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (A) of Section 26 of Act 108 of 2024, for renovation/replacement of
the Lewis Science Center, in a sum not to exceed .................$3,000,000.
(B) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (B) of Section 26 of Act 108 of 2024, for renovation of Mashburn
Hall, in a sum not to exceed .....................................$3,000,000.
(C) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (C) of Section 26 of Act 108 of 2024, for renovation of Old Main, in
a sum not to exceed ..............................................$3,000,000.
(D) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (D) of Section 26 of Act 108 of 2024, for critical maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ................................................$1,080,000.
(E) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (E) of Section 26 of Act 108 of 2024, for deferred maintenance, in a
sum not to exceed ................................................$3,890,000.
(F) Effective July 1, 2025, the balance of the appropriation provided
in Item (F) of Section 26 of Act 108 of 2024, for the purchase, replacement,
and renewal of equipment and library holdings, in a sum not to exceed
..................................................................$1,977,174.

SECTION 29. DISBURSEMENT CONTROLS. (A) No contract may be awarded nor
obligations otherwise incurred in relation to the project or projects
described herein in excess of the State Treasury funds actually available
therefor as provided by law. Provided, however, that institutions and
agencies listed herein shall have the authority to accept and use grants and
donations including Federal funds, and to use its unobligated cash income or
funds, or both available to it, for the purpose of supplementing the State
Treasury funds for financing the entire costs of the project or projects
enumerated herein. Provided further, that the appropriations and funds
otherwise provided by the General Assembly for Maintenance and General
Operations of the agency or institutions receiving appropriation herein shall
not be used for any of the purposes as appropriated in this act.
(B) The restrictions of any applicable provisions of the State
Purchasing Law, the General Accounting and Budgetary Procedures Law, the
Revenue Stabilization Law and any other applicable fiscal control laws of
02/04/2025 10:24:38 AM HAR045

SB196
this State and regulations promulgated by the Department of Finance and
Administration, as authorized by law, shall be strictly complied with in
disbursement of any funds provided by this act unless specifically provided
otherwise by law.

SECTION 30. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 31. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.











02/04/2025 10:24:38 AM HAR045